District of Columbia statutes.
36-128

“Person” defined.

Whenever the word “person” is used in this subchapter, it shall apply equally as well to 1 or more persons, copartnerships, and corporations.

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 811, ch. 737, § 8
1981 Ed., § 48-208.
1973 Ed., § 48-208.